Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-720.01
Appeal; allowance of fees and costs; applicable to pending cases.

The provisions of section 76-720 shall apply to any case now or hereafter pending on appeal from the award of the appraisers as provided in section 76-710.

Laws 1963, c. 432, § 3, p. 1449.